Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Foreclosure Sale

38-38-100.3.
Definitions.

As used in articles 37 to 39 of this title 38, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural property” means property, none of which, on the date of recording of the deed of trust or other lien or at the time of the recording of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens, is:

Platted as a subdivision;

Located within an incorporated town, city, or city and county; or

Valued and assessed as other than agricultural property pursuant to sections 39-1-102 (1.6)(a) and 39-1-103 (5), C.R.S., by the assessor of the county where the property is located.

(1.5)

“Amended mailing list” means the amended mailing list in accordance with section 38-38-103 (2) containing the names and addresses in the mailing list as defined in subsection (14) of this section and the names and addresses of the following persons:

The owner of the property, if different than the grantor of the deed of trust, as of the date and time of the recording of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens as shown in the records at the address indicated in such recorded instrument; and

Each person, except the public trustee, who appears to have an interest in the property described in the combined notice by an instrument recorded prior to the date and time of the recording of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens with the clerk and recorder of the county where the property or any portion thereof is located at the address of the person indicated on the instrument, if the person’s interest in the property may be extinguished by the foreclosure.

“Attorney for the holder” means an attorney licensed and in good standing in the state of Colorado to practice law and retained by the holder of an evidence of debt to process a foreclosure under this article.

(2.5)

“Borrower” means a person liable under an evidence of debt constituting a residential mortgage loan.

“Certified copy” means, with respect to a recorded document, a copy of the document certified by the clerk and recorder of the county where the document was recorded.

(3.5)

“CFPB” means the federal consumer financial protection bureau.

“Combined notice” means the combined notice of sale, right to cure, and right to redeem described in section 38-38-103 (4)(a).

(4.5)

“Complete loss mitigation application” means an application in connection with which a servicer has received all the information that the servicer requires from a borrower in evaluating applications for the loss mitigation options available to the borrower.

“Confirmation deed” means the deed described in section 38-38-501 in the form specified in section 38-38-502 or 38-38-503.

(5.3)

“Consensual lien” means a conveyance of an interest in real property, granted by the owner of the property after the recording of a notice of election and demand, that is not an absolute conveyance of fee title to the property. “Consensual lien” includes but is not limited to a deed of trust, mortgage or other assignment, encumbrance, option, lease, easement, contract, including an instrument specified in section 38-38-305, or conveyance as security for the performance of the grantor. “Consensual lien” does not include a lien described in section 38-38-306 or 38-33.3-316.

(5.7)

“Corporate surety bond” means a bond issued by a person authorized to issue bonds in the state of Colorado with the public trustee as obligee, conditioned against the delivery of an original evidence of debt to the damage of the public trustee.

“Cure statement” means the statement described in section 38-38-104 (2)(a).

“Deed of trust” means a security instrument containing a grant to a public trustee together with a power of sale.

“Evidence of debt” means a writing that evidences a promise to pay or a right to the payment of a monetary obligation, such as a promissory note, bond, negotiable instrument, a loan, credit, or similar agreement, or a monetary judgment entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

“Fees and costs” means all fees, charges, expenses, and costs described in section 38-38-107.

“Holder of an evidence of debt” or “holder” means the person in actual possession of or person entitled to enforce an evidence of debt; except that the term does not include a person acting as a nominee solely for the purpose of holding the evidence of debt or deed of trust as an electronic registry without any authority to enforce the evidence of debt or deed of trust. For the purposes of articles 37 to 40 of this title, the following persons are presumed to be the holder of an evidence of debt:

The person who is the obligee of and who is in possession of an original evidence of debt;

The person in possession of an original evidence of debt together with the proper indorsement or assignment thereof to such person in accordance with section 38-38-101 (6);

The person in possession of a negotiable instrument evidencing a debt, which has been duly negotiated to such person or to bearer or indorsed in blank; or

The person in possession of an evidence of debt with authority, which may be granted by the original evidence of debt or deed of trust, to enforce the evidence of debt as agent, nominee, or trustee or in a similar capacity for the obligee of the evidence of debt.

“Junior lien” means a deed of trust or other lien or encumbrance upon the property for which the amount due and owing thereunder is subordinate to the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed.

“Junior lienor” means a person who is a beneficiary, holder, or grantee of a junior lien.

(12.5)

“Lienor” includes without limitation the holder of a certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption for property, issued upon the foreclosure of a deed of trust or other lien on the property.

“Lis pendens” means a lis pendens in accordance with section 38-35-110 that is recorded with the clerk and recorder of the county where the property or any portion thereof is located and that refers to a judicial action in which one of the claims is for foreclosure and sale of the property by an officer or in which a claim or interest in the property is asserted.

(13.3)

“Loss mitigation application” means an oral or written request for a loss mitigation option that is accompanied by any information requested by a servicer for evaluation for a loss mitigation option.

(13.7)

“Loss mitigation option” means an alternative to foreclosure offered by the owner, holder, or assignee of a mortgage loan that is made available through the servicer to the borrower.

“Mailing list” means the mailing list in accordance with section 38-38-101 (1)(e) provided to the officer by the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder containing the names and addresses of the following persons:

The original grantor of the deed of trust or obligor under any other lien being foreclosed at the address shown in the recorded deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed and, if different, the last address, if any, shown in the records of the holder of the evidence of debt;

Any person known or believed by the holder of the evidence of debt to be personally liable under the evidence of debt secured by the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed at the last address, if any, shown in the records of the holder;

The occupant of the property, addressed to “occupant” at the address of the property; and

With respect to a public trustee sale, a lessee with an unrecorded possessory interest in the property at the address of the premises of the lessee and, if different, the address of the property, to the extent that the holder of the evidence of debt desires to terminate the possessory interest with the foreclosure.

“Maintaining and repairing” means the act of caring for and preserving a property in its current condition or restoring a property to a sound or working condition after damage; except that “maintaining and repairing” shall not include, unless done pursuant to an order entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, any act of advancing a property to a better condition or any act that increases the quality of or adds to the improvements located on a property.

“Notice of election and demand” means a notice of election and demand for sale related to a public trustee foreclosure under this article.

“Officer” means the public trustee or sheriff conducting a foreclosure under this article.

(17.3)

“Overbid” means the amount a property is sold for at a foreclosure sale that is in excess of the written or amended bid amount executed by the holder of the evidence of debt secured by the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed.

(17.5)

“Person” means any individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other legal entity.

“Property” means the portion of the property encumbered by a deed of trust or other lien that is being foreclosed under this article or the portion of the property being released from a deed of trust or other lien under article 39 of this title.

“Publish”, “publication”, “republish”, or “republication” means the placement by an officer of a legal notice that meets the requirements set forth in section 24-70-103 containing a combined notice that complies with the requirements of section 24-70-109 in a newspaper in the county or counties where the property to be sold is located. The officer shall select the newspaper.

“Qualified holder” means a holder of an evidence of debt, certificate of purchase, certificate of redemption, or confirmation deed that is also one of the following:

A bank as defined in section 11-101-401 (5), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

A federally chartered savings and loan association doing business in Colorado or a savings and loan association chartered under the “Savings and Loan Association Law,” articles 40 to 46 of title 11, C.R.S.;

A supervised lender as defined in section 5-1-301 (46), C.R.S., that is licensed to make supervised loans pursuant to section 5-2-302, C.R.S., and that is either:

A public entity, which is an entity that has issued voting securities that are listed on a national security exchange registered under the federal “Securities Exchange Act of 1934”, as amended; or

An entity in which all of the outstanding voting securities are held, directly or indirectly, by a public entity;

An entity in which all of the outstanding voting securities are held, directly or indirectly, by a public entity that also owns, directly or indirectly, all of the voting securities of a supervised lender as defined in section 5-1-301 (46), C.R.S., that is licensed to make supervised loans pursuant to section 5-2-302, C.R.S.;

A federal housing administration approved mortgagee;

A federally chartered credit union doing business in Colorado or a state-chartered credit union as described in section 11-30-101, C.R.S.;

An agency or department of the federal government;

An entity created or sponsored by the federal or state government that originates, insures, guarantees, or purchases loans or a person acting on behalf of such an entity to enforce an evidence of debt or the deed of trust securing an evidence of debt;

Any community development financial institution that has been certified and maintains such current status from the community development financial institutions fund administered by the United States department of the treasury, referred to in this section as the “fund”. In order to be a qualified holder under this article, the community development financial institution must:

Be a legal entity;

Have a primary mission of promoting community development;

Be a financing entity;

Primarily serve one or more target markets as defined by the fund;

Promote development services in conjunction with its financing activities;

Maintain accountability to its defined target market; and

Be a nongovernmental entity and not be under the control of any governmental entity; except that a tribal government is exempt from the requirements of this subparagraph (VII).

Any entity with active certification under the fund that originates, insures, guarantees, or purchases loans or a person acting on behalf of such an entity to enforce an evidence of debt or the deed of trust securing an evidence of debt;

A private company that originates, insures, guaranties, or purchases loans on behalf of a holder of evidence of debt that is secured by a deed of trust encumbering a time share estate as defined in section 38-33-110 (5), with a minimum of five million dollars in assets or not less than one thousand active loans; or

Any entity listed in paragraphs (a) to (k) of this subsection (20) acting in the capacity of agent, nominee except as otherwise specified in subsection (10) of this section, or trustee for another person.

“Records” means the records of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property is located.

(21.3)

“Residential mortgage loan” means a loan that is primarily for personal, family, or household use and that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent, consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a single-family dwelling or multiple-family dwelling of four or fewer units that is or will be used by the borrower as the borrower’s primary residence.

(21.6)

“Residential real estate” means any real property upon which a dwelling is or will be constructed.

“Sale” means a foreclosure sale conducted by an officer under this article.

“Secured indebtedness” means the amount owed pursuant to the evidence of debt without regard to the value of the collateral.

(23.3) (a) “Servicer” or “mortgage servicer” means an entity that directly services a loan or that is responsible for interacting with the borrower; managing the loan account on a daily basis, including collecting and crediting periodic loan payments; managing any escrow account; or enforcing the note and security instrument, either as the current holder of the evidence of debt or as the current holder’s authorized agent.

“Servicer” includes an entity providing such services pursuant to designation as a subservicing agent or by contract with a master servicer.

“Servicer” does not mean a trustee, including the public trustee, or a trustee’s authorized agent acting under a power of sale pursuant to a deed of trust.

(23.6)

“Single point of contact” means an individual or team of personnel, each of whom has the ability and authority to perform the responsibilities described in section 38-38-103.1 on behalf of the servicer. The servicer shall ensure that each member of the team is knowledgeable about the borrower’s situation and current status.

“Statement of redemption” means the signed and acknowledged statement of the holder of the evidence of debt or the signed statement of the attorney for the holder as required by section 38-38-302 (3) or the signed and acknowledged statement of the lienor or the signed statement of the attorney for the lienor as required by section 38-38-302 (1)(f).

History.

Source:
L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1438, § 6, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

IP, IP(10), (18), and (19) amended and (5.3), (5.7), and (12.5) added, p. 1831, § 5, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1.5) and (17.5) added and IP(10), (11), (14), and (19) amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 703, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2012:

(17.3) added,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 315, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2013:

(20)(b) repealed,(SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1489, § 73, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

IP(10) amended,(HB 14-1130), ch. 156, p. 541, § 1, effective May 9; (20)(i) and (20)(j) amended and (20)(k) and (20)(l) added,(SB 14-022), ch. 101, p. 374, § 1, effective August 6; (2.5), (3.5), (4.5), (13.3), (13.7), (21.3), (21.6), (23.3), and (23.6) added,(HB 14-1295), ch. 157, p. 545, § 1, effective January 1, 2015.

L. 2018:

IP and (19) amended,(HB 18-1254), ch. 138, p. 902, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(20)(k) amended and (20)(k.5) added,(HB 21-1224), ch. 199, p. 1057, § 1, effective May 28.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for the enactment of this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-101.
Holder of evidence of debt may elect to foreclose.

Documents required. Whenever a holder of an evidence of debt declares a violation of a covenant of a deed of trust and elects to publish all or a portion of the property therein described for sale, the holder or the attorney for the holder shall file the following with the public trustee of the county where the property is located:

A notice of election and demand signed and acknowledged by the holder of the evidence of debt or signed by the attorney for the holder;

The original evidence of debt, including any modifications to the original evidence of debt, together with the original indorsement or assignment thereof, if any, to the holder of the evidence of debt or other proper indorsement or assignment in accordance with subsection (6) of this section or, in lieu of the original evidence of debt, one of the following:

A corporate surety bond in the amount of one and one-half times the face amount of the original evidence of debt;

A copy of the evidence of debt and a certification signed and properly acknowledged by a holder of an evidence of debt acting for itself or as agent, nominee, or trustee under subsection (2) of this section or a statement signed by the attorney for such holder, citing the paragraph of section 38-38-100.3 (20) under which the holder claims to be a qualified holder and certifying or stating that the copy of the evidence of debt is true and correct and that the use of the copy is subject to the conditions described in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section; or

A certified copy of a monetary judgment entered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

The original recorded deed of trust securing the evidence of debt and any original recorded modifications of the deed of trust or any recorded partial releases of the deed of trust, or in lieu thereof, one of the following:

Certified copies of the recorded deed of trust and any recorded modifications of the deed of trust or recorded partial releases of the deed of trust; or

Copies of the recorded deed of trust and any recorded modifications of the deed of trust or recorded partial releases of the deed of trust and a certification signed and properly acknowledged by a holder of an evidence of debt acting for itself or as an agent, nominee, or trustee under subsection (2) of this section or a signed statement by the attorney for such holder, citing the paragraph of section 38-38-100.3 (20) under which the holder claims to be a qualified holder and certifying or stating that the copies of the recorded deed of trust and any recorded modifications of the deed of trust or recorded partial releases of the deed of trust are true and correct and that the use of the copies is subject to the conditions described in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section;

A combined notice pursuant to section 38-38-103; except that the combined notice may be omitted with the prior approval of the public trustee;

A mailing list;

Any affidavit recorded pursuant to section 38-35-109 (5) affecting the deed of trust described in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), which affidavit shall be accepted by the public trustee as modifying the deed of trust for all purposes under this article only if the affidavit is filed with the public trustee at the same time as the other documents required under this subsection (1);

If there is a loan servicer of the evidence of debt described in the notice of election and demand and the loan servicer is not the holder, a statement executed by the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for such holder, identifying, to the best of such person’s knowledge, the name of the loan servicer;

A statement executed by the holder of an evidence of debt, or the attorney for such holder, identifying, to the best knowledge of the person executing such statement, the name and address of the current owner of the property described in the notice of election and demand; and

Repealed.

Foreclosure by qualified holder without original evidence of debt, original or certified copy of deed of trust, or proper indorsement.

A qualified holder, whether acting for itself or as agent, nominee, or trustee under section 38-38-100.3 (20), that elects to foreclose without the original evidence of debt pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, or without the original recorded deed of trust or a certified copy thereof pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, or without the proper indorsement or assignment of an evidence of debt under paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall, by operation of law, be deemed to have agreed to indemnify and defend any person liable for repayment of any portion of the original evidence of debt in the event that the original evidence of debt is presented for payment to the extent of any amount, other than the amount of a deficiency remaining under the evidence of debt after deducting the amount bid at sale, and any person who sustains a loss due to any title defect that results from reliance upon a sale at which the original evidence of debt was not presented. The indemnity granted by this subsection (2) shall be limited to actual economic loss suffered together with any court costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in defending a claim brought as a direct and proximate cause of the failure to produce the original evidence of debt, but such indemnity shall not include, and no claimant shall be entitled to, any special, incidental, consequential, reliance, expectation, or punitive damages of any kind. A qualified holder acting as agent, nominee, or trustee shall be liable for the indemnity pursuant to this subsection (2).

In the event that a qualified holder or the attorney for the holder commences a foreclosure without production of the original evidence of debt, proper indorsement or assignment, or the original recorded deed of trust or a certified copy thereof, the qualified holder or the attorney for the holder may submit the original evidence of debt, proper indorsement or assignment, or the original recorded deed of trust or a certified copy thereof to the officer prior to the sale. In such event, the sale shall be conducted and administered as if the original evidence of debt, proper indorsement or assignment, or the original recorded deed of trust or a certified copy thereof had been submitted at the time of commencement of such proceeding, and any indemnities deemed to have been given by the qualified holder under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be null and void as to the instrument produced under this paragraph (b).

In the event that a foreclosure is conducted where the original evidence of debt, proper indorsement or assignment, or original recorded deed of trust or certified copy thereof has not been produced, the only claims shall be against the indemnitor as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and not against the foreclosed property or the attorney for the holder of the evidence of debt. Nothing in this section shall preclude a person liable for repayment of the evidence of debt from pursuing remedies allowed by law.

Foreclosure on a portion of property. A holder of an evidence of debt may elect to foreclose a deed of trust under this article against a portion of the property encumbered by the deed of trust only if such portion is encumbered as a separate and distinct parcel or lot by the original or an amended deed of trust. Any foreclosure conducted by a public trustee against less than all of the property then encumbered by the deed of trust shall not affect the lien or the power of sale contained therein as to the remaining property. The amount bid at a sale of less than all of the property shall be deemed to have satisfied the secured indebtedness to the extent of the amount of the bid.

Notice of election and demand. A notice of election and demand filed with the public trustee pursuant to this section shall contain the following:

The names of the original grantors of the deed of trust being foreclosed and the original beneficiaries or grantees thereof;

The name of the holder of the evidence of debt;

The date of the deed of trust being foreclosed;

The recording date, county, book, and page or reception number of the recording of the deed of trust being foreclosed;

The amount of the original principal balance of the secured indebtedness;

The amount of the outstanding principal balance of the secured indebtedness as of the date of the notice of election and demand;

A legal description of the property to be foreclosed as set forth in the documents to be provided to the public trustee pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section;

A statement of whether the property described in the notice of election and demand is all or only a portion of the property then encumbered by the deed of trust being foreclosed;

A statement of the violation of the covenant of the evidence of debt or deed of trust being foreclosed upon which the foreclosure is based, which statement shall not constitute a waiver of any right accruing on account of any violation of any covenant of the evidence of debt or deed of trust other than the violation specified in the notice of election and demand;

The name, address, business telephone number, and bar registration number of the attorney for the holder of the evidence of debt, which may be indicated in the signature block of the notice of election and demand; and

A description of any changes to the deed of trust described in the notice of election and demand that are based on an affidavit filed with the public trustee under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section, together with the recording date and reception number or book and page number of the recording of that affidavit in the records.

Error in notice. In the event that the amount of the outstanding principal balance due and owing upon the secured indebtedness is erroneously set forth in the notice of election and demand or the combined notice, the error shall not affect the validity of the notice of election and demand, the combined notice, the publication, the sale, the certificate of purchase described in section 38-38-401, the certificate of redemption described in section 38-38-402, the confirmation deed as defined in section 38-38-100.3 (5), or any other document executed in connection therewith.

Indorsement or assignment.

Proper indorsement or assignment of an evidence of debt shall include the original indorsement or assignment or a certified copy of an indorsement or assignment recorded in the county where the property being foreclosed is located.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (6), the original evidence of debt or a copy thereof without proper indorsement or assignment shall be deemed to be properly indorsed or assigned if a qualified holder presents the original evidence of debt or a copy thereof to the officer together with a statement in the certification of the qualified holder or in the statement of the attorney for the qualified holder pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section that the party on whose behalf the foreclosure was commenced is the holder of the evidence of debt.

Multiple instruments. If the evidence of debt consists of multiple instruments, such as notes or bonds, the holder of the evidence of debt may elect to foreclose with respect to fewer than all of such instruments or documents by identifying in the notice of election and demand and the combined notice only those to be satisfied in whole or in part, in which case the requirements of this section shall apply only as to those instruments or documents.

Assignment or transfer of debt during foreclosure.

The holder of the evidence of debt may assign or transfer the secured indebtedness at any time during the pendency of a foreclosure action without affecting the validity of the secured indebtedness. Upon receipt of written notice signed by the holder who commenced the foreclosure action or the attorney for the holder stating that the evidence of debt has been assigned and transferred and identifying the assignee or transferee, the public trustee shall complete the foreclosure as directed by the assignee or transferee or the attorney for the assignee or transferee. No holder of an evidence of debt, certificate of purchase, or certificate of redemption shall be liable to any third party for the acts or omissions of any assignee or transferee that occur after the date of the assignment or transfer.

The assignment or transfer of the secured indebtedness during the pendency of a foreclosure shall be deemed made without recourse unless otherwise agreed in a written statement signed by the assignor or transferor. The holder of the evidence of debt, certificate of purchase, or certificate of redemption making the assignment or transfer and the attorney for the holder shall have no duty, obligation, or liability to the assignee or transferee or to any third party for any act or omission with respect to the foreclosure or the loan servicing of the secured indebtedness after the assignment or transfer. If an assignment or transfer is made by a qualified holder that commenced the foreclosure pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the qualified holder’s indemnity under said subsection (2) shall remain in effect with respect to all parties except to the assignee or transferee, unless otherwise agreed in a writing signed by the assignee or transferee if the assignee or transferee is a qualified holder.

If an assignment or transfer is made to a holder of an evidence of debt other than a qualified holder, the holder must file with the officer the original evidence of debt and the original recorded deed of trust or, in lieu thereof, the documents required in paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section. An assignee or transferee shall be presumed to not be a qualified holder, and as such, shall be subject to the provisions of this paragraph (c), unless a signed statement by the attorney for such assignee or transferee that cites the paragraph of section 38-38-100.3 (20) under which the assignee or transferee claims to be a qualified holder is filed with the officer.

Partial release from deed of trust. At any time after the recording of the notice of election and demand but prior to the sale, a portion of the property may be released from the deed of trust being foreclosed pursuant to section 38-39-102 or as otherwise provided by order of a court of competent jurisdiction recorded in the county where the property being released is located. Upon recording of the release or court order, the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder shall pay the fee described in section 38-37-104 (1)(b)(IX), amend the combined notice, and, in the case of a public trustee foreclosure, amend the notice of election and demand to describe the property that continues to be secured by the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed as of the effective date of the release or court order; except that the amended combined notice may be omitted with the prior approval of the public trustee. The public trustee shall record the amended notice of election and demand upon receipt. Upon receipt of the amended combined notice, if provided by the holder or the attorney for the holder, the public trustee shall republish and mail the amended combined notice in the manner set forth in section 38-38-109 (1)(b). If the amended combined notice was omitted pursuant to this subsection (9), upon recordation of the amended notice of election and demand, the public trustee shall supply an amended combined notice and shall then republish and mail the amended combined notice in the manner set forth in section 38-38-109 (1)(b).

Deposit.

The public trustee may require the holder or servicer to make a deposit of up to five hundred dollars plus the amount of the fee permitted pursuant to section 38-37-104 (1)(b)(I), at the time the notice of election and demand is filed, to be applied against the fees and costs of the public trustee.

The public trustee may allow the attorney for the holder or servicer or the holder or servicer, if not represented by an attorney, to establish with the public trustee one or more accounts, from which the public trustee may pay the fees and costs of the public trustee in any foreclosure filed by the holder or the attorney for the holder and through which the public trustee may transmit refunds or cures, overbids, or redemption proceeds.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1653, § 2, effective October 1; (7)(a) amended, p. 1685, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 92:

(7)(a) amended, p. 2089, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(b), (7)(a), and (11) amended and (1.5), (1.6), (1.7), and (1.8) added, p. 1333, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1.5)(a) and (1.5)(b) amended, p. 1211, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1441, § 7, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 1832, § 6, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1)(h) added,(HB 09-1276), ch. 404, p. 2220, § 2, effective June 2; (8)(c) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 707, § 3, effective September 1; (1), (4)(g), (4)(j), (6), (9), and (10) amended and (4)(k) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 704, § 2, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(1)(h) amended,(HB 10-1240), ch. 200, p. 871, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(1)(h) amended,(SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 895, § 171, effective July 1; (1)(f.5) added and (10) amended,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 315, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2014:

(10) amended,(HB 14-1130), ch. 156, p. 541, § 2, effective May 9; (2)(a) amended,(SB 14-022), ch. 101, p. 375, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

(1)(h) repealed,(SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 791, § 102, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(1)(d), (9), and (10)(a) amended,(HB 18-1254), ch. 138, p. 902, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor’s note:

(1) The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1990. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

(3) Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 09-1207 and House Bill 09-1276 were harmonized.

38-38-102.
Recording notice of election and demand - record of sale.

No later than ten business days following the receipt of the notice of election and demand, the public trustee shall review the documents filed pursuant to section 38-38-101 (1) and, if the filing is complete, cause the notice to be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property described in the notice is located.

The public trustee shall retain in the public trustee’s records a printed or electronic copy of the notice of election and demand and the combined notice, as published pursuant to section 38-38-103. Such records shall be available for inspection by the public at the public trustee’s offices during the public trustee’s normal business hours.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1656, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 398 § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1446, § 8, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1) amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 707, § 4, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-37-137, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-102.5.
Notice prior to residential foreclosure - hotline.

As used in this section, “holder” means the holder of an evidence of debt constituting a residential mortgage loan, as defined in section 12-10-702 (21), or that holder’s loan servicer or other person acting on the holder’s behalf. “Holder” shall not include a person whose only activity as a holder is as the seller in not more than three credit sales or loans per year.

At least thirty days before filing a notice of election and demand and at least thirty days after default, the holder shall mail a notice addressed to the original grantor of the deed of trust at the address in the recorded deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed and, if different, at the last address shown in the holder’s records, containing:

The telephone number of the Colorado foreclosure hotline;

The direct telephone number of the holder’s loss mitigation representative or department; and

A statement that, under section 6-1-1107, C.R.S., it is illegal for any person acting as a foreclosure consultant to charge an up-front fee or deposit to the borrower for services related to the foreclosure.

This section shall apply only to a default consisting solely of the failure of the original grantor of the deed of trust to make one or more required payments.

With respect to defaults on the same obligation, after the holder has once given the original grantor of the deed of trust a notice as specified in subsection (2) of this section, this section imposes no limitation on the holder’s right to foreclose with respect to any subsequent default that occurs within twelve months after such notice.

History.

Source:
L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 447, § 1, effective January 1, 2002.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 1481, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 2258, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2009:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 708, § 5, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (HB 14-1295), ch. 157, p. 546, § 2, effective January 1, 2015.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1725, § 239, effective October 1.